test/src/gt-desc-yamls/V-mingkve_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:


# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.
# (2007: 47)

  Verb - миӈкве: # Verb 'give' - full paradigm
# perhaps stem should be in миӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: тоты
    миӈкве+V+Inf: миӈкве

#    миӈкве+V: [тотнуве]
#    миӈкве+V: [тотымэн]

    миӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl1: мыгӯв
    миӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl2: мае̄н
    миӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl3: мыгыт
    миӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScDu1: мыгме̄н
    миӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScDu2: мае̄н
    миӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScDu3: мыгыг
    миӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: мыгум
    миӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg2: мае̄н
    миӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: мыг


    миӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: мисум
    миӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg2: мисын
    миӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: мис
    миӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScDu1: мисуме̄н
    миӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScDu2: мисы̄н
    миӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScDu3: мисы̄г
    миӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl1: мисув
    миӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl2: мисы̄н
    миӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl3: мисыт

    миӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg1: [минувум]
    миӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg2: [минувын]
    миӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg3: [минув]
    миӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu1: [минувамен]
    миӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu2: [минувын]
    миӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu3: [минувыг]
    миӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl1: [минувув]
    миӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl2: [минувын]
    миӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl3: [минувыт]


#    миӈкве+V+Imp+ScDu2: [тотэн]
#    миӈкве+V+Imp+ScPl2: [тотэн]
#    миӈкве+V+Imp+ScSg2: [тотэн]


#    миӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+OcSg3+ScSg1: тотылум
#    миӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+OcSg3+ScSg2: [тотылын]
#    миӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+OcSg3+ScSg3: [тотытэ]
#    миӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+OcSg3+ScDu1: x
#    миӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+OcSg3+ScDu2: [тотылын]
#    миӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+OcSg3+ScDu3: [тотытэн]
#    миӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+OcSg3+ScPl1: [тотылув]
#    миӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+OcSg3+ScPl2: [тотылын]
#    миӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+OcSg3+ScPl3: [тотыяныл]

#    миӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+OcDu3+ScSg1: [тотыягум]
#    миӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+OcDu3+ScSg2: [тотыягын]
#    миӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+OcDu3+ScSg3: [тотыяге]
#    миӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+OcDu3+ScDu1: [тотыягмен]
#    миӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+OcDu3+ScDu2: [тотыягын]
#    миӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+OcDu3+ScDu3: [тотыяген]
#    миӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+OcDu3+ScPl1: [тотыягув]
#    миӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+OcDu3+ScPl2: [тотыягын]
#    миӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+OcDu3+ScPl3: [тотыяганыл]

#    миӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+OcPl3+ScSg1: [тотыянум]
#    миӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+OcPl3+ScSg2: [тотыян]
#    миӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+OcPl3+ScSg3: [тотыянэ]
#    миӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+OcPl3+ScDu1: [тотылумен]
#    миӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+OcPl3+ScDu2: xxx
#    миӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+OcPl3+ScDu3: [тотыянэн]
#    миӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+OcPl3+ScPl1: [тотыянув]
#    миӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+OcPl3+ScPl2: x
#    миӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+OcPl3+ScPl3: [тотыяныл]

    миӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScSg1: мислум
    миӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScSg2: мислын
    миӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScSg3: мистэ
    миӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScDu1: мисламен
    миӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScDu2: мислын
    миӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScDu3: мистэн
    миӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScPl1: мислув
    миӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScPl2: мислын
    миӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScPl3: мисаныл


    миӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScSg1: мисагум
    миӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScSg2: мисагын
    миӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScSg3: мисаге
    миӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScDu1: [мисагме̄н, мисагмен]
    миӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScDu2: [мисагы̄н, мисагын]
    миӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScDu3: [мисаге̄н, мисагаге̄н, мисаген]
    миӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScPl1: мисагув
    миӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScPl2: [мисагы̄н, мисагын]
    миӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScPl3: мисаганыл

    миӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScSg1: мисанум
    миӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScSg2: [мисан, миса̄нын]
    миӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScSg3: мисанэ
    миӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScDu1: [мисанаме̄н, мисананме̄н]
    миӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScDu2: [мисан, мисаны̄н]
    миӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScDu3: [мисанэ̄н, мисананэ̄н]
    миӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScPl1: мисанув
    миӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScPl2: [мисан, мисаны̄н]
    миӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScPl3: [мисаныл, мисананыл]

    
    миӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScSg1: [минувлум]
    миӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScSg2: [минувлын]
    миӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScSg3: [минувтэ]
    миӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScDu1: [минувламен]
    миӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScDu2: [минувлын]
#    миӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScDu3: x
    миӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScPl1: [минувлув]
    миӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScPl2: [минувлын]
    миӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScPl3: [минуваныл]

    миӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScSg1: [минувагум]
    миӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScSg2: [минувагын]
    миӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScSg3: [минуваге]
    миӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScDu1: [минувагмен]
    миӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScDu2: [минувагын]
    миӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScDu3: [минуваген]
#    миӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScPl1: x
    миӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScPl2: [минувагын]
#    миӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScPl3: x

    миӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScSg1: [минуванум]
    миӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScSg2: [минуванын]
    миӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScSg3: [минуванэ]
    миӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScDu1: [минуванмен]
    миӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScDu2: [минуванын]
    миӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScDu3: [минуванэн]
    миӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScPl1: [минуванув]
    миӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScPl2: [минуванын]
    миӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScPl3: [минуваныл]

#    миӈкве+V+Imp+OcSg3+ScSg2: [тотэлн]
#    миӈкве+V+Imp+OcSg3+ScDu2: [тотэлн]
#    миӈкве+V+Imp+OcSg3+ScPl2: [тотэлн]

#    миӈкве+V+Imp+OcDu3+ScSg2: [тотэгын]
#    миӈкве+V+Imp+OcDu3+ScDu2: [тотэгын]
#    миӈкве+V+Imp+OcDu3+ScPl2: [тотэгын]

#    миӈкве+V+Imp+OcPl3+ScSg2: [тотэн]
#    миӈкве+V+Imp+OcPl3+ScDu2: [тотэн]
#    миӈкве+V+Imp+OcPl3+ScPl2: [тотэн]


#    миӈкве+V+Pass+Prs+ScSg1: [тотавем]
#    миӈкве+V+Pass+Prs+ScSg2: [тотавен]
#    миӈкве+V+Pass+Prs+ScSg3: [тотаве]
#    миӈкве+V+Pass+Prs+ScDu1: [тотавемен]
#    миӈкве+V+Pass+Prs+ScDu2: [тотавен]
#    миӈкве+V+Pass+Prs+ScDu3: [тотавег]
#    миӈкве+V+Pass+Prs+ScPl1: [тотавев]
#    миӈкве+V+Pass+Prs+ScPl2: [тотавен]
#    миӈкве+V+Pass+Prs+ScPl3: [тотавет]


    миӈкве+V+Pass+Prt+ScSg1: майве̄сум
    миӈкве+V+Pass+Prt+ScSg2: майве̄сн
    миӈкве+V+Pass+Prt+ScSg3: майвес
    миӈкве+V+Pass+Prt+ScDu1: майвесаме̄н
    миӈкве+V+Pass+Prt+ScDu2: майвесы̄н
    миӈкве+V+Pass+Prt+ScDu3: майвесы̄г
    миӈкве+V+Pass+Prt+ScPl1: майвесув
    миӈкве+V+Pass+Prt+ScPl2: майвесы̄н
    миӈкве+V+Pass+Prt+ScPl3: майве̄сыт

#    миӈкве+V: [минувев]
#    миӈкве+V: [минувем]
#    миӈкве+V: [минувен]
#    миӈкве+V: [минувет]
#    миӈкве+V: [тотыянул]
#
#    миӈкве+V: [минувлэн]
#    миӈкве+V: [мисуме̄н]
#    миӈкве+V: [майвесемен]
#    миӈкве+V: [мисанамен]
#    миӈкве+V: [тотыянамен]

# йиӈкве 'tulla'
йиӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: ювум
йиӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg2: ювын
йиӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: юв

йиӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu1: ювмēн
йиӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu2: ювын
йиӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu3: ювыг

йиӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl1: ювӯв
йиӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl2: ювы̄н
йиӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl3: ювыт

#тэ̄ӈкве 'syödä' 
тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: тэ̄гум
тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg2: тэ̄гын
тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: тэ̄г

тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu1: тэ̄гмēн
тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu2: тэ̄гын
тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu3: тэ̄гыг

тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl1: тэ̄гӯв
тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl2: тэ̄гын
тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl3: тэ̄гыт

# лыӈкве ’heittää’, виӈкве ‘ottaa’, ва̄ ӈкве ‘nähdä’
